Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Reports

48-228-201. Financial statements for members.

A board-managed LLC shall prepare financial statements at least annually, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the LLC and one (1) or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the reporting period and an income statement for that period. If financial statements are prepared for the LLC on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the financial statements must also be prepared on that basis. If requested in writing by any member or holder of financial rights, the LLC shall furnish such statements to such person as set out in subsection (c).

If the annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant's report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by a statement of the chief manager or the person responsible for the LLC's accounting records:

Stating such person's reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis for accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

An LLC shall mail the annual financial statements to each requesting member or holder of financial rights, within one (1) month after notice of the request; provided, that with respect to the financial statements for the most recently completed fiscal year, the statements shall be mailed to the member within four (4) months after the close of the fiscal year.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-228-202. Financial statements for member-managed LLCs.

A member or holder of financial rights of a member-managed LLC shall have access to true and full information regarding the status of the business and financial condition of the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-228-203. Annual report for secretary of state.

Each domestic LLC, and each foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this state, shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an annual report that sets forth:

The name of the LLC and the jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated;

The street address and zip code of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at that office in this state;

The street address, including the zip code, of its principal executive office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal executive office);

If the LLC is board-managed (or its equivalent), the names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its governors (or their equivalent);

The names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its managers (or equivalent);

The federal employer identification number (FEIN) of the LLC, or if such number has not been obtained, a representation that it has been applied for; and

The number of members of the LLC at the date of filing.

Information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the LLC.

Every LLC shall file the annual report with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the fourth month following the end of the close of the LLC's fiscal year or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2014, ch. 783, § 11; 2020, ch. 719, § 14.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added “or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state” at the end of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.